Connecticut, session 2026, SB00065.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
one million five hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall
be used by the Office of Policy and Management for the purpose of
providing a grant-in-aid to the town of Stafford for improvements to the
town hall that comply with the physical accessibility guidelines under
the federal Americans with Disabilities Act.